test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_I_miskweyaab_gt-norm.yaml
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Obv+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyniwan, miskweyaabiinyminwan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyniing, miskweyaabiinyminiing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyniwan, miskweyaabiinyminwan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Obv+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinswaan, miskweyaabiinsmiwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinswaang, miskweyaabiinsmiwaang]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinswaan, miskweyaabiinsmiwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Obv+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsniwan, miskweyaabiinsminwan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsniing, miskweyaabiinsminiing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsniwan, miskweyaabiinsminwan]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 6, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Obv+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinybaniin, nmiskweyaabiinymibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Loc+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinybaniing, nmiskweyaabiinymibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinybaniin, nmiskweyaabiinymibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsbaniin, nmiskweyaabiinsmibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsbaniing, nmiskweyaabiinsmibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiinsbaniin, nmiskweyaabiinsmibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Obv+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinybaniin, gmiskweyaabiinymibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Loc+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinybaniing, gmiskweyaabiinymibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinybaniin, gmiskweyaabiinymibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsbaniin, gmiskweyaabiinsmibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsbaniing, gmiskweyaabiinsmibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiinsbaniin, gmiskweyaabiinsmibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Obv+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinybaniin, miskweyaabiinymibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Loc+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinybaniing, miskweyaabiinymibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinybaniin, miskweyaabiinymibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsbaniin, miskweyaabiinsmibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsbaniing, miskweyaabiinsmibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiinsbaniin, miskweyaabiinsmibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Obv+PxX: [miskweyaabiinybaniin, miskweyaabiinymibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Loc+PxX: [miskweyaabiinybaniing, miskweyaabiinymibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiinybaniin, miskweyaabiinymibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Obv+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsbaniin, miskweyaabiinsmibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsbaniing, miskweyaabiinsmibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiinsbaniin, miskweyaabiinsmibniin]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 5]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 5, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 5, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 6, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 5, 6]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiishnaanba, nmiskweyaabiimshinaanba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiishnaandig, nmiskweyaabiimshinaandig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishnaanba, gmiskweyaabiimshinaanba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishnaandig, gmiskweyaabiimshinaandig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishwaaba, gmiskweyaabiimshiwaaba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishwaadig, gmiskweyaabiimshiwaadig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiishwaaba, miskweyaabiimshiwaaba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiishwaadig, miskweyaabiimshiwaadig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px4: [miskweyaabiishniwba, miskweyaabiimshinwiba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiishniwdig, miskweyaabiimshinwidig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 5, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Obv+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiishnaanin, nmiskweyaabiimshinaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiishnaaning, nmiskweyaabiimshinaaning]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiishnaanin, nmiskweyaabiimshinaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Obv+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishnaanin, gmiskweyaabiimshinaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishnaaning, gmiskweyaabiimshinaaning]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishnaanin, gmiskweyaabiimshinaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Obv+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishwaan, gmiskweyaabiimshiwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishwaang, gmiskweyaabiimshiwaang]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiishwaan, gmiskweyaabiimshiwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Obv+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiishwaan, miskweyaabiimshiwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiishwaang, miskweyaabiimshiwaang]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiishwaan, miskweyaabiimshiwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Obv+Px4: [miskweyaabiishniwan, miskweyaabiimshinwan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc+Px4: [miskweyaabiishniing, miskweyaabiimshiniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiishniwan, miskweyaabiimshinwan]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 6, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiishbaniin, nmiskweyaabiimshibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiishbaniing, nmiskweyaabiimshibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px1Sg: [nmiskweyaabiishbaniin, nmiskweyaabiimshibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiishbaniin, gmiskweyaabiimshibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiishbaniing, gmiskweyaabiimshibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px2Sg: [gmiskweyaabiishbaniin, gmiskweyaabiimshibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiishbaniin, miskweyaabiimshibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiishbaniing, miskweyaabiimshibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px3Sg: [miskweyaabiishbaniin, miskweyaabiimshibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Obv+PxX: [miskweyaabiishbaniin, miskweyaabiimshibniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc+PxX: [miskweyaabiishbaniing, miskweyaabiimshibniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl+PxX: [miskweyaabiishbaniin, miskweyaabiimshibniin]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 5, 6, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Obv+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinaanbaniin, nmiskweyaabiimnaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Loc+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinaanbaniing, nmiskweyaabiimnaanbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinaanbaniin, nmiskweyaabiimnaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Obv+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinaanbaniin, gmiskweyaabiimnaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Loc+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinaanbaniing, gmiskweyaabiimnaanbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinaanbaniin, gmiskweyaabiimnaanbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Obv+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiiwaabniin, gmiskweyaabiimwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Loc+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiiwaabniing, gmiskweyaabiimwaabniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiiwaabniin, gmiskweyaabiimwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Obv+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiiwaabniin, miskweyaabiimwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Loc+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiiwaabniing, miskweyaabiimwaabniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiiwaabniin, miskweyaabiimwaabniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Obv+Px4: [miskweyaabiinwibniin, miskweyaabiimniwbaniin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Loc+Px4: [miskweyaabiinwibniing, miskweyaabiimniwbaniing]
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinwibniin, miskweyaabiimniwbaniin]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 4, 6, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Obv: mskweyaabiinyshibniin
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: mskweyaabiinyshibniing
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: mskweyaabiinyshibniin
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Obv: mskweyaabiinsshibniin
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: mskweyaabiinsshibniing
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: mskweyaabiinsshibniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 5]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 5, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 5, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 6, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 5, 6]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinyshinaanba, nmiskweyaabiinymishnaanba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinyshinaandig, nmiskweyaabiinymishnaandig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsshinaanba, nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsshinaandig, nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaandig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshinaanba, gmiskweyaabiinymishnaanba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshinaandig, gmiskweyaabiinymishnaandig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaaba, gmiskweyaabiinymishwaaba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaadig, gmiskweyaabiinymishwaadig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshinaanba, gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshinaandig, gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaandig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaaba, gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaaba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaadig, gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaadig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinyshiwaaba, miskweyaabiinymishwaaba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinyshiwaadig, miskweyaabiinymishwaadig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyshinwiba, miskweyaabiinymishniwba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinyshinwidig, miskweyaabiinymishniwdig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinsshiwaaba, miskweyaabiinsmishwaaba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px3Pl: [miskweyaabiinsshiwaadig, miskweyaabiinsmishwaadig]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsshinwiba, miskweyaabiinsmishniwba]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px4: [miskweyaabiinsshinwidig, miskweyaabiinsmishniwdig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 5, 7]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Obv+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinyshinaanin, nmiskweyaabiinymishnaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Loc+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinyshinaaning, nmiskweyaabiinymishnaaning]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinyshinaanin, nmiskweyaabiinymishnaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsshinaanin, nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsshinaaning, nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaaning]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px1Pl: [nmiskweyaabiinsshinaanin, nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Obv+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshinaanin, gmiskweyaabiinymishnaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Loc+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshinaaning, gmiskweyaabiinymishnaaning]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshinaanin, gmiskweyaabiinymishnaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Obv+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaan, gmiskweyaabiinymishwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Loc+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaang, gmiskweyaabiinymishwaang]
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinyshiwaan, gmiskweyaabiinymishwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshinaanin, gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshinaaning, gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaaning]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px21Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshinaanin, gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaanin]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaan, gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaan]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaang, gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaang]
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px2Pl: [gmiskweyaabiinsshiwaan, gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaan]
